Illinois, session 104th, SB728.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Health Maintenance Organization Act is 5amended by changing Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 125/1-1)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1401)7    Sec. 1-1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as 8the "Health Maintenance Organization Act".9(Source: P.A. 85-20.)